src/install/bin/server/open.office31/share/uno_packages/cache/uno_packages/15FF.tmp_/dict-fr.oxt/fr_FR.aff
FLAG long
SFX pN Y 54
SFX pN valoir valoir/n'q'd'm't's' valoir
SFX pN valoir valant/n'q'm't's' valoir
SFX pN valoir valu/q' valoir
SFX pN valoir valus révaloir
SFX pN valoir value révaloir
SFX pN valoir values révaloir
SFX pN valoir vaux/n'j'm't' valoir
SFX pN valoir vaux/n'm't' valoir
SFX pN valoir vaut/n'm't's' valoir
SFX pN valoir valons/n't' valoir
SFX pN valoir valez/n'm' valoir
SFX pN valoir valent/n'm't's' valoir
SFX pN valoir valais/n'j'm't' valoir
SFX pN valoir valais/n'm't' valoir
SFX pN valoir valait/n'm't's' valoir
SFX pN valoir valions/n't' valoir
SFX pN valoir valiez/n'm' valoir
SFX pN valoir valaient/n'm't's' valoir
SFX pN valoir valus/n'j'm't' valoir
SFX pN valoir valus/n'm't' valoir
SFX pN valoir valut/n'm't's' valoir
SFX pN valoir valûmes/n't' valoir
SFX pN valoir valûtes/n'm' valoir
SFX pN valoir valurent/n'm't's' valoir
SFX pN valoir vaudrai/n'j'm't' valoir
SFX pN valoir vaudras/n'm't' valoir
SFX pN valoir vaudra/n'm't's' valoir
SFX pN valoir vaudrons/n't' valoir
SFX pN valoir vaudrez/n'm' valoir
SFX pN valoir vaudront/n'm't's' valoir
SFX pN valoir vaudrais/n'j'm't' valoir
SFX pN valoir vaudrais/n'm't' valoir
SFX pN valoir vaudrait/n'm't's' valoir
SFX pN valoir vaudrions/n't' valoir
SFX pN valoir vaudriez/n'm' valoir
SFX pN valoir vaudraient/n'm't's' valoir
SFX pN valoir vaille/n'j'm't' quivaloir
SFX pN valoir vale révaloir
SFX pN valoir vailles/n'm't' quivaloir
SFX pN valoir vales révaloir
SFX pN valoir vaille/n'm't's' quivaloir
SFX pN valoir vale révaloir
SFX pN valoir vailions/n't' quivaloir
SFX pN valoir valions révaloir
SFX pN valoir vailiez/n'm' quivaloir
SFX pN valoir valiez révaloir
SFX pN valoir vaillent/n'm't's' quivaloir
SFX pN valoir valent révaloir
SFX pN valoir valusse/n'j'm't' valoir
SFX pN valoir valusses/n'm't' valoir
SFX pN valoir valût/n'm't's' valoir
SFX pN valoir valussions/n't' valoir
SFX pN valoir valussiez/n'm' valoir
SFX pN valoir valussent/n'm't's' valoir

SFX pO N 15
SFX pO valoir valoir revaloir
SFX pO valoir valant revaloir
SFX pO valoir valu revaloir
SFX pO valoir vaudrai revaloir
SFX pO valoir vaudras revaloir
SFX pO valoir vaudra revaloir
SFX pO valoir vaudrons revaloir
SFX pO valoir vaudrez revaloir
SFX pO valoir vaudront revaloir
SFX pO valoir vaudrais revaloir
SFX pO valoir vaudrais revaloir
SFX pO valoir vaudrait revaloir
SFX pO valoir vaudrions revaloir
SFX pO valoir vaudriez revaloir
SFX pO valoir vaudraient revaloir

SFX pP N 2
SFX pP paroir paroir comparoir
SFX pP paroir parant comparoir

SFX pQ N 2
SFX pQ haloir haloir chaloir
SFX pQ haloir halant chaloir

SFX pR Y 2
SFX pR pparoir pparoir/n'q'd' apparoir
SFX pR pparoir ppert/n'q' apparoir
