src/install/bin/server/open.office31/share/uno_packages/cache/uno_packages/15FF.tmp_/dict-fr.oxt/fr_FR.dic
apparoir/pR()
chaloir/pQ()
comparoir/pP()
prévaloir/pN()
revaloir/pO()
équivaloir/pN()
